incubator/apertium-krc/tests/yots.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../krc.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../krc.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] -Iб":
   къой<v><tv><prc_perf> : къоюб

 "[twol] -AрGA":
   къой<v><tv><ger_aor><dat> : къояргъа
   тый<v><tv><ger_aor><dat> : тыяргъа

 "[twol] -sIn": 
   король<n><px3sp><nom> : королю
